Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-678
Permit; application; contents.

(1) Applications for permits required by section 46-677 shall be on forms provided by the Chief Water Officer and shall contain:

(a) A statement of the amount of ground water which the applicant proposes to use;

(b) A statement of the proposed use and whether the ground water will be transferred for use at a location other than the well site;

(c) A hydrologic evaluation of the impact of the proposed use on the surrounding area and on existing users;

(d) The date when the applicant expects to first use the ground water; and

(e) Such other relevant information as the Chief Water Officer may deem necessary or desirable.

(2) Such applications shall be accompanied by an exhibit of maps showing the location, depth, and capacity of the proposed water wells.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 789, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 192.